Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-11] Open-market sale, sealed bids,
or auction. (a) If the court orders a sale of heirs property, the sale
shall be an open-market sale unless the court finds that a sale by sealed bids
or an auction would be more economically advantageous and in the best interest
of the cotenants as a group.

(b) If the court orders an open-market sale
and the parties, not later than ten days after the entry of the order, agree on
a real estate broker licensed in this State to offer the property for sale, the
court shall appoint that broker and establish a reasonable commission. If the
parties do not agree on a broker, the court shall appoint a disinterested real
estate broker licensed in this State to offer the property for sale and shall
establish a reasonable commission. The broker shall offer the property for
sale in a commercially reasonable manner at a price not lower than the
determination of value and on the terms and conditions established by the
court.

(c) If the broker appointed under subsection
(b) obtains within a reasonable time an offer to purchase the property for at
least the determination of value:

(1) The broker shall comply with the reporting
requirements set forth in section 668A-12; and

(2) The sale may be completed in accordance with state
law other than this chapter.

(d) If the broker appointed under subsection
(b) does not obtain within a reasonable time an offer to purchase the property
for at least the determination of value, the court, after hearing, may:

(1) Approve the highest outstanding offer, if any;

(2) Redetermine the value of the property and order
that the property continue to be offered for an additional time; or

(3) Order that the property be sold by sealed bids or
at an auction.

(e) If the court orders a sale by sealed bids
or an auction, the court shall set terms and conditions of the sale. If the
court orders an auction, the auction shall be conducted pursuant to chapter 667
or 668, as applicable.

(f) If a purchaser is entitled to a share of
the proceeds of the sale, the purchaser is entitled to a credit against the
price in an amount equal to the purchaser's share of the proceeds. [L 2016, c
260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next